Utah statutes.
77-23-103.   Circumstances permitting an administrative traffic checkpoint.
A motor vehicle may be stopped and the occupants detained by an enforcement
officer when the enforcement officer:
(1)  is acting pursuant to a duly authorized search warrant or arrest warrant;
(2)  has probable cause to arrest or search;
(3)  has reasonable suspicion that criminal activity has occurred or is
occurring;
(4)  is acting under emergency circumstances; or
(5)  is acting pursuant to duly authorized administrative traffic checkpoint
authority granted by a magistrate in accordance with Section 77-23-104.
